Hawaii statutes.
TITLE 18.
EDUCATION

Chapter

296 Public Education--Repealed

296C School/Community-Based Management--Repealed

296D School Priority Fund--Repealed

297 Personnel of Public Schools--Repealed

297D Hawaii Teacher Standards Board--Repealed

298 Schools and Attendance, Generally--Repealed

299 Driver Education--Repealed

300 Technical and Vocational Training--Repealed

301 Other Special Training--Repealed

302 Agents of Private Schools and Correspondence

Schools--Repealed

302A Education

302B Public Charter Schools--Repealed

302C Private Schools

302D Public Charter Schools

302H Hawaiian Language Medium Education

302L Early Learning System

303 Employees' Annuity and Custodial Account
Contracts

304 University of Hawaii--Repealed

304A University of Hawaii System

304D Center for Nursing--Repealed

304E Nursing Scholars Program--Repealed

305 Community Colleges--Repealed

305A Career and Technical Education Under Federal

Aid--Repealed

305E College-Credit Equivalency Program--Repealed

305H State Post-Secondary Education Commission—Repealed

305J Post-Secondary Education Authorization

306 University Projects--Repealed

307 Research Corporation of the University
of Hawaii--

Repealed

308 University Parking--Repealed

309 Student Loan Funds

309H Hawaii Health Corps

310 Western Regional Education Compact--Repealed

311 Compact for Education

311D Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity
for

Military Children

312 Libraries

314 Hawaii Public Broadcasting
Authority--Repealed

315 Interstate Agreement on Qualifications of

Educational Personnel

317 Secondary School Students Conference

318 College and University Student Leaders

Conference--Repealed

319 Dental Education

Note

Kauai community college--Hawaii excellence through science
and technology academy pilot program (reports through 2010 legislature). L
2007, c 111, §§7 to 10.

Cross References

College savings program, see chapter 256.

Individual development accounts, see chapter 257.

CHAPTER
296

PUBLIC
EDUCATION

REPEALED. L 1996, c 89, §19.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next